Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 4 Pretrial Release and Diversion Programs

Editor’s notes.

This article is the same as or substantially similar to former Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 42.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 174: Revising Georgia’s List of Bail Restricted Offenses,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (2021).

42-3-70.
Operation of pretrial release and diversion programs.

DCS shall be authorized to establish and operate pretrial release and diversion programs as rehabilitative measures for persons charged with felonies for which bond is permissible under the law in the courts of this state prior to conviction; provided, however, that no such program shall be established in a county without the unanimous approval of the superior court judges, the district attorney, and the sheriff of such county. The board shall promulgate rules and regulations governing any pretrial release and diversion programs established and operated by DCS and shall grant authorization for the establishment of such programs based on the availability of sufficient staff and resources.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section is the same as or substantially similar to former Code Section 42-8-80.

42-3-71.
Discretionary release upon application by person charged with felony.

The court in which a person is charged with a felony for which bond is permissible under the law may, upon the application by the person so charged, at its discretion release the person prior to conviction and upon recognizance to the supervision of a pretrial release or diversion program established and operated by DCS after an investigation and upon recommendation of the staff of the pretrial release or diversion program. In no case, however, shall any person be so released unless after consultation with his or her attorney or an attorney made available to the person if he or she is indigent that person has voluntarily agreed to participate in the pretrial release or diversion program and knowingly and intelligently has waived his or her right to a speedy trial for the period of pretrial release or diversion.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-72.
Contracts with counties for services and facilities.

DCS may contract with the various counties of this state for the services and facilities necessary to operate pretrial release and diversion programs established under this article, and both DCS and the counties are authorized to enter into such contracts as are appropriate to carry out the purpose of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-73.
Authority to establish and operate pretrial release diversion programs does not affect contracting authority of Georgia Department of Labor.

The authority to establish and operate pretrial release and diversion programs granted to DCS under this article shall not affect the authority of the Georgia Department of Labor to enter into agreements with district attorneys of the several judicial circuits of this state for the purpose of establishing and operating pretrial intervention programs in such judicial circuits.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310.

42-3-74.
Judicial approval for pretrial release and diversion program required.

No person shall be released on an unsecured judicial release as provided for in Code Section 17-6-12 or approved for a pretrial release and diversion program without first having the approval in writing of the judge of the court having jurisdiction of the case.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-3-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 1-1/HB 310; Ga. L. 2020, p. 570, § 3-3/SB 402.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “an unsecured judicial release as provided for in Code Section 17-6-12” for “his or her own recognizance” near the beginning of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 174: Revising Georgia’s List of Bail Restricted Offenses,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 41 (2021).